Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-366
Capital stock, defined.

Capital stock shall mean that part of the capital or liabilities of an association representing ownership of the association and which is not subject to being withdrawn or the value paid to the holder of such stock until all other liabilities of the association have been fully liquidated and paid.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 11.